District of Columbia statutes.
2-215.09

Repealed

Functions of the Commission.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 10, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 5(g), 27 DCR 3280
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-167, § 2(c), (d), 29 DCR 4983
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 11, 32 DCR 30
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520
1973 Ed., § 1-859.
1981 Ed., § 1-1149.